Massachusetts, session 194th, H2458.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall be a 
commission to study the benefits of direct primary care practices, and how these services can be 
promoted in Massachusetts to ease the burden on the state's healthcare system and promote 
access to care.   
SECTION 2. The commission shall study and report on the benefits of direct primary 
care services, including, but not limited to, reduced health care and prescription drug costs, cost 
transparency, enhanced access to care, and improved health outcomes. The commission’s report 
shall include strategies for promoting direct primary care services in the commonwealth, 
including any policy recommendations to expand access to and increase public awareness of 
these services.  

of 2 11  SECTION 3. The commission shall consist of the secretary of the executive office of 
health & human services or their designee, who shall serve as the chair; the house and senate 
chairs of the joint committee on public health; the house and senate chairs of the joint committee 
on healthcare financing; the CEO of the Massachusetts Health and Hospital Association, or their 
designee; 2 representatives from the direct primary care industry to be appointed by the secretary 
of the executive office of health & human services; 1 member to be appointed by the minority 
leader of the house; and 1 member to be appointed by the minority leader of the senate.  
SECTION 4. The commission shall hold no fewer than 3 public hearings to gather input 
from stakeholders, including, but not limited to, representatives of hospital and health systems, 
direct primary care physicians, and patient advocacy organizations.  
SECTION 5. The commission shall file its report, including findings and 
recommendations, with the clerks of the house of representatives and senate, the joint committee 
on public health, and the joint committee on healthcare financing not later than 12 months after 
the effective date of this act.  
SECTION 6. This act shall take effect immediately upon passage.